Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1299.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Stop the bleed pilot program; control kits; training; delayed repeal; definition A. The stop the bleed pilot program is established in the department of health services.  If sufficient monies are available, the department of health services shall purchase bleed control kits and distribute the bleed control kits to each school district that chooses to administer stop the bleed training and requests bleed control kits from the department.  The department of health services shall provide each school nurse within a participating school district that school's allotment of bleed control kits after the school nurses in that school district have received stop the bleed training. B. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each school district may develop and implement a stop the bleed program in consultation with local law enforcement.  The program may be implemented in each school and must require: 1. At least one bleed control kit to be placed in an easily accessible location within the school as determined by the school after consulting with local law enforcement. 2. Bleed control kits to be included in the school district-level safety plans. 3. Annual inspection of each bleed control kit.  School officials shall replace, as necessary, any expired or missing materials, supplies or equipment required for a bleed control kit.  The school district may apply to the department of health services for replacement materials, supplies or equipment. C. The department of health services may accept gifts, grants, donations and in-kind donations for the purposes of this section. D. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2029. E. For the purposes of this section, "bleed control kit" means a first aid response kit that contains: 1. At least one tourniquet endorsed by the United States department of defense's committee on tactical combat casualty care. 2. At least one compression bandage. 3. At least one bleeding control bandage. 4. Protective gloves. 5. At least one marker. 6. Scissors. 7. Bleeding control instructional materials developed by either: (a) The United States department of homeland security, as part of the department's "stop the bleed" campaign. (b) The American college of surgeons committee on trauma. Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of health services; stop the bleed pilot program; exemption A. The sum of $180,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services to purchase stop the bleed control kits pursuant to this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.